test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-TA-1-wîcihîw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

   Lemma - wîcihîw

      # Core 

      # Prs+Ind
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2SgO: kiwîcihitin	# I help you
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3SgO: niwîcihâw	# I help him/her
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: kiwîcihin	# you help me
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3SgO: kiwîcihâw	# you help him/her
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: wîcihîw	# he/she helps another/others
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: [wîcihikow, wîcihik]	# another/others help him/her

      # Prs+Cnj
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2SgO: î-wîcihitân	# as I help you
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3SgO: î-wîcihak	# as I help him/her
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: î-wîcihithan	# as you help me
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3SgO: î-wîcihat	# as you help him/her
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: î-wîcihât	# as he/she helps another/others
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: î-wîcihikot	# as another/others help him/her

      # Imp
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1SgO: wîcihin	# (you) help me now
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3SgO: wîcih	# (you) help him/her now
      

      # Prs # Ind

      # 1Sg
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2SgO: kiwîcihitin	# I help you
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3SgO: niwîcihâw	# I help him/her
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2PlO: kiwîcihitinâwâw	# I help you all
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3PlO: niwîcihâwak	# I help them
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: niwîcihimâwa	# I help another/others

      # 2Sg
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: kiwîcihin	# you help me
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3SgO: kiwîcihâw	# you help him/her
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO: kiwîcihinân	# you help us
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3PlO: kiwîcihâwak	# you help them
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: kiwîcihimâwa	# you help another/others

      # 3Sg
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: kiwîcihin	# you help me
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+2SgO: kiwîcihik	# he/she helps you
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO: kiwîcihinân	# you help us
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+12PlO: kiwîcihikonaw	# he/she helps you and us
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+2PlO: kiwîcihikowâw	# he/she helps you all
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3PlO: kiwîcihâwak	# you help them
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: kiwîcihimâwa	# you help another/others
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: wîcihimîw	# he/she helps yet another/others

      # 1Pl
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2SgO: kiwîcihitinân	# we help you
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3SgO: niwîcihânân	# we help him/her
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2PlO: kiwîcihitinân	# we help you all
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3PlO: niwîcihânânak	# we help them
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: niwîcihimânâna	# we help another/others

      # 12Pl
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+3SgO: kiwîcihânaw	# we and you help him/her
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+3PlO: kiwîcihânawak	# we and you help them
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: kiwîcihimânawa	# we and you help another/others

      # 2Pl
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1SgO: kiwîcihinâwâw	# you all help me
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3SgO: kiwîcihâwâw	# you all help him/her
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1PlO: kiwîcihinân	# you all help us
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3PlO: kiwîcihâwâwak	# you all help them
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: kiwîcihimâwâwa	# you all help another/others

      # 3Pl
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+1SgO: [niwîcihikowak, niwîcihikwak]	# they help me
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+2SgO: [kiwîcihikowak, kiwîcihikwak]	# they help you
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+1PlO: niwîcihikonânak	# they help us
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+12PlO: kiwîcihikonawak	# they help you and us
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+2PlO: kiwîcihikowâwak	# they help you all
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: wîcihîwak	# they help another/others
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: wîcihimîwak	# they help yet another/others

      # 4Sg/Pl
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: niwîcihikothiwa	# another/others help me
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: kiwîcihikothiwa	# another/others help you
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: [wîcihikow, wîcihik]	# another/others help him/her
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: niwîcihikonâna	# another/others help us
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: kiwîcihikonawa	# another/others help you and us
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: kiwîcihikowâwa	# another/others help you all
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: [wîcihikowak, wîcihikwak]	# another/others help them
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: wîcihîthiwa	# another/others help yet another/others

      # 5Sg/Pl
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: wîcihikothiwa	# yet another/others help another/others

      # X
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+1SgO: niwîcihikawin	# someone helps me
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+2SgO: kiwîcihikawin	# someone helps you
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+3SgO: wîcihâw	# someone helps him/her
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+1PlO: niwîcihikawinân	# someone helps us
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+12PlO: [kiwîcihikawinaw, kiwîcihikawinânaw]	# someone helps you and us
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+2PlO: kiwîcihikawinâwâw	# someone helps you all
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+3PlO: wîcihâwak	# someone helps them
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+4Sg/PlO: wîcihâthiwa	# someone helps another/others

      # 0Sg/Pl
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+1SgO: wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+1SgO
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+2SgO: wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+2SgO
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+3SgO: wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+3SgO
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+1PlO: wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+1PlO
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+12PlO: wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+12PlO
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+2PlO: wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+2PlO
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+3PlO: wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+3PlO
      wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+0Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO
      

      # Prs # Cnj

      # 1Sg
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2SgO: î-wîcihitân	# as I help you
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3SgO: î-wîcihak	# as I help him/her
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2PlO: î-wîcihitakok	# as I help you all
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3PlO: î-wîcihakik	# as I help them
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: î-wîcihimak	# as I help another/others

      # 2Sg
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: î-wîcihithan	# as you help me
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3SgO: î-wîcihat	# as you help him/her
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO: î-wîcihithâhk	# as you help us
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3PlO: î-wîcihacik	# as you help them
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: î-wîcihimat	# as you help another/others

      # 3Sg
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: î-wîcihithan	# as you help me
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2SgO: î-wîcihisk	# as he/she helps you
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO: î-wîcihithâhk	# as you help us
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+12PlO: î-wîcihikothahk	# as he/she helps you and us
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2PlO: î-wîcihikothîk	# as he/she helps you all
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3PlO: î-wîcihacik	# as you help them
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: î-wîcihimat	# as you help another/others
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: î-wîcihimât	# as he/she helps yet another/others

      # 1Pl
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2SgO: î-wîcihitâhk	# as we help you
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3SgO: î-wîcihâthâhk	# as we help him/her
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2PlO: î-wîcihitâhk	# as we help you all
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3PlO: î-wîcihâthâhkik	# as we help them
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-wîcihimâthâhk	# as we help another/others

      # 12Pl
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3SgO: î-wîcihâthahk	# as we and you help him/her
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3PlO: î-wîcihâthahkok	# as we and you help them
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-wîcihimâthahk	# as we and you help another/others

      # 2Pl
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1SgO: î-wîcihithîk	# as you all help me
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3SgO: î-wîcihâthîk	# as you all help him/her
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1PlO: î-wîcihithâhk	# as you all help us
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3PlO: î-wîcihâthîkok	# as you all help them
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-wîcihimâthîk	# as you all help another/others

      # 3Pl
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1SgO: î-wîcihicik	# as they help me
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2SgO: î-wîcihiskik	# as they help you
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1PlO: î-wîcihikothâhkik	# as they help us
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+12PlO: î-wîcihikothahkok	# as they help you and us
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2PlO: î-wîcihikothîkok	# as they help you all
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-wîcihâcik	# as they help another/others
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: î-wîcihimâcik	# as they help yet another/others

      # 4Sg/Pl
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: î-wîcihimit	# as another/others help me
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: î-wîcihimisk	# as another/others help you
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: î-wîcihikot	# as another/others help him/her
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: î-wîcihikothâhk	# as another/others help us
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: î-wîcihikothahk	# as another/others help you and us
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: î-wîcihikothîk	# as another/others help you all
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: î-wîcihikocik	# as another/others help them
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: î-wîcihâthit	# as another/others help yet another/others

      # 5Sg/Pl
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-wîcihikothit	# as yet another/others help another/others

      # X
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+1SgO: î-wîcihikawithân	# as someone helps me
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+2SgO: î-wîcihikawithan	# as someone helps you
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+3SgO: î-wîcihiht	# as someone helps him/her
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+1PlO: î-wîcihikawithâhk	# as someone helps us
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+12PlO: î-wîcihikawithahk	# as someone helps you and us
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+2PlO: î-wîcihikawithîk	# as someone helps you all
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+3PlO: î-wîcihihcik	# as someone helps them
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+4Sg/PlO: î-wîcihimiht	# as someone helps another/others

      # 0Sg/Pl
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+1SgO: PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+1SgO
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+2SgO: PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+2SgO
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+3SgO: PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+3SgO
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+1PlO: PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+1PlO
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+12PlO: PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+12PlO
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+2PlO: PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+2PlO
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+3PlO: PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+3PlO
      PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: PV/e+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+0Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO
      

      # Prt # Ind

      # 1Sg
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2SgO: kikî-wîcihitin	# I helped you
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3SgO: nikî-wîcihâw	# I helped him/her
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2PlO: kikî-wîcihitinâwâw	# I helped you all
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3PlO: nikî-wîcihâwak	# I helped them
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: nikî-wîcihimâwa	# I helped another/others

      # 2Sg
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: kikî-wîcihin	# you helped me
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3SgO: kikî-wîcihâw	# you helped him/her
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO: kikî-wîcihinân	# you helped us
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3PlO: kikî-wîcihâwak	# you helped them
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: kikî-wîcihimâwa	# you helped another/others
